Utah statutes.
17B-1-1103.   Levy to pay for general obligation bonds.
(1) (a)  If a district has issued general obligation bonds, or expects to have
debt service payments due on general obligation bonds during the current year,
the district's board of trustees may make an annual levy of ad valorem
property taxes in order to:
(i)  pay the principal of and interest on the general obligation bonds;
(ii)  establish a sinking fund for defaults and future debt service on the
general obligation bonds; and
(iii)  establish a reserve to secure payment of the general obligation bonds.
(b)  A levy under Subsection (1)(a) is:
(i)  for a water conservancy district, subject to the limit stated in Section
17B-2a-1006; and
(ii)  for each other local district, without limitation as to rate or amount.
(2) (a)  Each district that levies a tax under Subsection (1) shall:
(i)  levy the tax as a separate and special levy for the specific purposes
stated in Subsection (1); and
(ii)  apply the proceeds from the levy solely for the purpose of paying the
principal of and interest on the general obligation bonds, even though the
proceeds may be used to establish or replenish a sinking fund under Subsection
(1)(a)(ii) or a reserve under Subsection (1)(a)(iii).
(b)  A levy under Subsection (2)(a) is not subject to a priority in favor of a
district obligation in existence at the time the bonds were issued.
